Missouri, session 2026, SB1321.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 577, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 577.690, to read as
follows:
577.690. 1. A person commits the offense of improper
entry by an alien if the person enters this state at any
time when the person is in violation of 8 U.S.C. Section
1325.
2. (1) The offense of improper entry by an alien is
punishable by a fine of ten thousand dollars and shall be
subject to an order of removal, as provided pursuant to
subsection 3 of this section. For subsequent offenses, the
offense of improper entry by an alien is a class E felony
and shall be subject to an order of removal, as provided in
subsection 3 of this section, upon the completion of any
prison term. If a person has been charged with another
offense that is punishable as a class A misdemeanor or any
higher category offense, the person shall complete any term
of imprisonment or pay any fine prior to being subject to an
order of removal.

SB 1321 2
(2) Any person serving a term of imprisonment pursuant
to subdivision (1) of this subsection may petition the
circuit court for an order of removal, which the court shall
grant absent aggravating circumstances which, in the
discretion of the court, require denial of such a petition.
Any person granted an order of removal pursuant to this
subdivision who thereafter returns to this state in
violation of 8 U.S.C. Section 1325 shall be subject to the
remainder of any term of imprisonment to which the person
was previously sentenced but had not completed prior to the
removal and such person shall not be entitled to apply to
the circuit court for any further orders of removal.
3. An order of removal shall include all of the
following:
(1) The manner of transportation of the person to a
port of entry, as defined by 19 CFR Part 101; and
(2) The law enforcement officer or state agency
responsible for monitoring compliance with the order.
4. In lieu of continuing the prosecution of or
entering an adjudication regarding the offense of improper
entry, the court at any time after the person's appearance
may, upon request, dismiss the charge pending against the
person and issue an order of removal, as provided in
subsection 3 of this section.
5. Any law enforcement officer whose duty it is to
enforce criminal laws of this state may, upon probable cause
that a person has violated subsection 1 of this section,
arrest or detain such person in a manner consistent with
chapter 544.
✓